<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88802-0006 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-02-88.f2.A1005</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Social Security Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">20 CFR Part 404 and 416 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Regulations No. 4 and No. 16] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Federal Old-Age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance Benefits; SupplementalSecurity Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled; Continued Payment ofBenefits During Appeal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Social Security Administration, HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> These final regulations implement section 223(g) of theSocial Security Act (the Act) as added by section 2 of Pub. L. 97-455 andamended by section 7 of the Social Security Disability Benefits ReformAct of 1984 (Pub. L. 98-460 enacted in October 1984) and section 9009 ofPub. L. 100-203. These regulations also implement section 1631 of the Act,as amended by section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460. These statutory provisions providethat the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall by regulations prescribethe manner, form, and time limit within which an individual may elect continuedpayment of disability/blindness benefits and/or Medicare pending the outcomeof his or her appeal of a determination by the Social Security Administration(SSA) that his or her physical or mental impairment(s) for which benefitswere payable has ceased, never existed, or is no longer disabling. Thesefinal regulations provide the rules for electing continuation of benefitsunder these statutory provisions. Under these final regulations, the option to elect to continue receivingbenefits pending the outcome of a request for reconsideration or hearingbefore an administrative law judge on a medical cessation will be providedto the following: _Recipients of disability insurance benefits (and their auxiliary dependentsreceiving benefits on the recipient's wage record). _Recipients of disabled adult child's benefits. _Recipients of disabled widow's and disabled widower's benefits. _Mothers and fathers having in care a disabled adult child. _Mothers and fathers having in care a child, under age 18 but over age15, who is disabled and receiving child's benefits. _Recipients of Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits based on disabilityor blindness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES:</T2> These rules are effective August 2, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Lawrence V. Dudar, Legal Assistant,Office of Regulations, Social Security Administration, 3-B-4 OperationsBuilding, 6401 Security Boulevard, Baltimore, MD 21235, telephone (301)965-1795.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> These rules implement sections 223(g)and 1631 of the Act, as amended by section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 and section9009 of Pub. L. 100-203 which temporarily extend the title II benefit continuationprovisions of prior laws and permanently create a statutory benefit continuationprovision for title XVI medical cessation cases. Section 223(a)(1) of the Act provides that a Social Security title II disabilityinsurance beneficiary found to be not disabled under the provisions ofthe Act will receive benefits for two months after the month in which hisor her disability ceased. Disability is ordinarily considered to have ceasedin the month the cessation determination is made. Similarly, section 202(d)(1)(G)of the Act provides that a title II disabled child beneficiary (as definedby the Act) found to be not disabled under the provisions of the Act willreceive benefits for two months after the month in which his or her disabilityceased. Disability is ordinarily considered to have ceased in the monththe cessation determination is made. The regulations at 20 CFR 404.900<T3>et seq.</T3> give these title II beneficiaries the right to appeala determination of medical cessation through the administrative process.Prior to Pub. L. 97-455, title II beneficiaries were not eligible for paymentof continued benefits during an appeal of a determination that they wereno longer medically disabled. However, if the initial cessation determinationwas reversed on appeal, benefits were paid retroactively to the first monthfor which benefits were not paid as a result of the determination of disabilitycessation. Section 1631(a)(5) of the Act similarly provides that a title XVI recipientof disability or blindness benefits will receive benefits for two monthsafter the month in which his or her disability/blindness ceased. Disabilityis ordinarily considered to have ceased in the month the cessation determinationis made. Revised regulations at 20 CFR 416.1413(d), 51 FR 288 (January3, 1986) provide for an opportunity for a disability hearing at the reconsiderationlevel when title XVI or concurrent title II/XVI individuals appeal a determination,based on medical factors, that he or she is not blind or disabled (a medicalcessation). These individuals retain the right to appeal this reconsiderationdetermination through a hearing before an administrative law judge. Prior to the enactment of Pub. L. 98-460, benefit continuation was providedin title XVI and concurrent title II/title XVI cases bases on the U.S.Supreme Court decision in <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly, </T3>397 U.S. 254 (1970). Prior to the publicationof these rules, regulations at 20 CFR 416.1336 provided that title XVIrecipients found to be no longer disabled or blind could have their benefitscontinued through the first step of appeal.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section 2 of Pub. L. 97-455</ITAG>Section 2 of Pub. L. 97-455, enacted in January 1983, added a new subsection(g) to section 223 of the Act. Under this provision, a title II disabilityinsurance beneficiary or a child, widow, or widower entitled to benefitsbased on disability, who receives a determination that the physical ormental impairment(s) on the basis of which such benefits are payable isfound to have ceased, not to have existed, or to no longer be disablingmay elect to have benefits continued during appeal of the cessation determinationthrough the reconsideration level, and/or until a hearing decision or orderof dismissal is issued by an administrative law judge. Section 2 of Pub.L. 97-455 also permits the beneficiary to elect continuation of any otherbenefits that are based on his or her wages and self-employment income,including benefits under title XVIII of the Act (Medicare). Any continuedbenefits paid under this provision, except for those made under title XVIII,are subject to recovery as overpayments, subject to the same waiver provisionsin current law (section 204 of the Act) and regulations (20 CFR 404.501<T3>et seq.</T3>), where the medical cessation determination is upheld,on appeal, by the final decision of the Secretary, However, waiver of recoveryof such an overpayment is considered only if the cessation determinationwas appealed in good faith.This temporary provision allows continued payment of title II disabilityinsurance benefits for months beginning in February 1983 for January 1983or, if later, the first month for which benefits were no longer otherwisepayable under the most recent medical cessation determination or orderof remand.This provision was originally effective for medical cessation determinationsmade after January 11, 1983, pending administrative review, and prior toOctober 1, 1983.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section 2 of Pub. L. 98-118</ITAG>This provision extended the sunset date of section of Pub. L. 97-455 forcontinued payment of title II disability benefits during appeal to includemedical cessation determinations made prior to December 7, 1983.<ITAG tagnum="85">Section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 and Section 9009 of Pub. L. 100-203</ITAG>Section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 (which amends section 223(g) of the Act) extendedthe effective date of the provisions of Pub. L. 97-455 for title II casesto include determinations that the physical or mental impairment(s) onthe basis of which such benefits are payable is found to have ceased, notto have existed or to no longer be disabling made prior to January 1, 1988.(Extended to January 1, 1989 by section 9009 of Pub. L. 100-203.) Becausethis provision remains temporary, in no case can title II disability benefitpayments be made for months after June 1989. Section 7 also provides forthe continuation of payment of benefits under title II and benefits undertitle XVIII to a father or mother who has in his or her care a child, overage 15, who is disabled and receiving child's benefits, based on such disability.Section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 also amends section 1631(a) of the Act to adda new paragraph (7). Under this permanent provision, a recipient of supplementalsecurity income benefits based on disability or blindness, who receivesa determination that the physical or mental impairment(s) on the basisof which such benefits are payable is found to have ceased, not to haveexisted or to no longer be disabling may elect to have benefits continuedduring appeal of this determination. If elected, these benefits would bepaid until the month before the month a decision is issued after an administrativelaw judge hearing or the month before the month no appeal for a reviewor hearing is pending, whichever is earlier. Supplemental security incomebenefits paid under this provision are subject to recovery as overpaymentsand to the waiver of recovery provisions pursuant to section 1631(b) ofthe Act if the initial medical cessation determination is affirmed by afinal decision of the Secretary. However, waiver of recovery of such anoverpayment will be considered only if the determination was appealed ingood faith.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Provisions</ITAG>Title IIThese regulations at andSection; 404.1597(b) explain that after we have madea determination that an individual's physical or mental impairment(s) hasceased, never existed, or is no longer disabling, the individual's titleII benefits based on disability will be stopped. We will send the individualwritten notice of our determination that explains it, the right to appealand the right to request continued benefits pending reconsideration and/ora hearing on the disability cessation determination.For the purpose of the regulations of andSection; 404.1597(b) and 404.1597aonly, ``benefits'' means disability case payments and/or Medicare, if applicable.``Election of benefits'' means the election of disability case paymentsand/or Medicare, if applicable.Under section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 and these implementing regulations, titleII individuals who receive a closed period of disability determinationdo not have the right to request continuation of benefits during appeal.A closed period of disability determination is a determination on an applicationfor benefits that establishes a period of disability for only a specifiedperiod of time in the past. In a closed period of disability, there isno determination that would reach current status. Continuation of benefitsduring appeal is available only if current entitlement is in question.Also, under these regulations, title II individuals who receive an unfavorabledetermination on their initial disability claim (that is their applicationfor benefits based on disability) do not have the right to request continuationof benefits during appeal since continued benefits are only available toclaimants who were already receiving benefits.The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a (a) and (b) explain that title IIindividuals who receive a medical cessation determination may elect tohave benefits continued during appeal of that determination. Title II benefitsmay be continued only if the determination that the individual's physicalor mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, or is no longerdisabling is made on or after January 12, 1983 (or before January 12, 1983,and a timely request for reconsideration or a hearing before an ALJ waspending on that date) and before January 1, 1989. If elected, title IIbenefits may be continued beginning with the month of January 1983 or thefirst month for which benefits are no longer otherwise payable followinga medical cessation determination or the month of election, whichever islater.The payments to a title II individual who has elected to have benefitscontinued will continue until the earlier of the month before the montha decision is issued after the ALJ hearing or the month before the montha new decision is issued by the ALJ (or final action is taken by the AppealsCouncil on the ALJ's recommended decision) if the individual's case wassent back to an ALJ for further action, or until the month before the monthno timely request for appeal is pending after notification of an unfavorabletitle II reconsideration determination, or June 1989.To clarify our policy on cessation appeals filed under both title II andtitle XVI (a concurrent claim), we added new language to these final regulationsat andSection; 404.1597a(a). This new language does not represent a changein the concurrent claim policy announced in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking(NPRM). Although we stated in the NPRM preamble how concurrent appealswould be processed, we had no statement on concurrent appeals in the rulesthemselves. We explained in the preamble to the NPRM that in a concurrentclaim, the title II appeal is processed under the title II rules and thetitle XVI appeal is processed under the title XVI rules. In this finalregulation, we have explicitly stated this policy in the regulatory textat andSection; 404.1597a(a).The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a(c) explain that a title II primarybeneficiary may also elect to have benefits continued for any title IIauxiliary beneficiaries (e.g., eligible spouse or children) during thisappeal. If elected, continued benefits for the auxiliaries will be continuedfor the same time periods provided for the title II primary beneficiary.Under these regulations, auxiliary beneficiaries may also elect whetherthey wish to receive continued payment of benefits, but the title II primarybeneficiary must also elect to have their benefits continued in order forthe auxiliary beneficiaries to be paid. The right also to elect continuedpayment of benefits is given to title II auxiliary beneficiaries becausethese beneficiaries will be asked to repay any overpayment resulting frombenefits continued pending the outcome of the appeal. Since the auxiliarybeneficiaries may not be aware of the primary beneficiary's election ofcontinued benefits on their behalf, they will be required to make a separateelection to have their benefits continue.The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a(d) explain that we will notify thetitle II individual of his or her right to elect continued benefits ifhe or she requests reconsideration or a hearing on our disability cessationdetermination. If the individual requests reconsideration or a hearing,we will request a written statement of choice from the title II individualas to whether or not he or she wants benefits to continue during appeal,and whether or not he or she also wants title II benefits to continue toanyone else who is receiving benefits based on the title II individual'swages and self-employment income.Title II beneficiaries may elect continuation of benefits at the time reconsiderationis requested and again at the time a hearing before an administrative lawjudge is requested. In title II cases, a separate election must be madeat each level of appeal.If the title II beneficiary does not elect continuation of benefits atthe time reconsideration is requested, but requests it at the time theadministrative law judge hearing is requested, we will reinstate continuedbenefits effective with the month of the latest medical cessation determinationrather than the first month of nonpayment after the initial medical cessationdetermination. The written statement of choice, which must be completedby the primary beneficiary, explains this provision.The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a(e) explain that we also will contactthe spouse and/or children of a title II individual, and obtain a statementin writing from them as to whether or not they wish to receive continuedbenefits. However, for the auxiliary beneficiaries (spouse or children)to receive continued benefits, the title II individual must also requestthat benefits be continued for them. Under these regulations, title IIauxiliary beneficiaries (spouse or children) who are living in a separatehousehold and those in the same household will be asked to repay any overpaymentresulting from benefits continued pending the outcome of the appeal. Sinceauxiliaries (spouse or children) may not be aware of the title II primarybeneficiary's election of continued benefits on their behalf, these regulationsprovide that a separate statement of choice to receive or not to receivecontinued benefits will also be required from auxiliary beneficiaries.The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a(f), (g), (h) and (i) explain thata title II individual must request continued benefits: (1) Within 10 daysafter he or she receives notice of our initial cessation determinationalong with requesting reconsideration of that initial determination (The60-day period for requesting reconsideration is not affected by this provision.);(2) within 10 days after receiving notice of our reconsideration cessationdetermination along with requesting a hearing before an administrativelaw judge (The 60-day period for requesting a hearing is not affected bythis provision.); or (3) within 10 days after receiving a notice of theoption for continued benefits in connection with a decision (includingcourt remand cases except those court remands which carry special benefitcontinuation rights explained in section 2(e) of Pub. L. 98-460) that hasbeen vacated and sent back (remanded) by the Appeals Council to an administrativelaw judge for further action.Our experience with benefit continuation under Pub. L. 97-455 and 98-118,which utilized a 10-day time frame, showed that most eligible title IIindividuals made an election within the 10 days. Under these regulations,these individuals are given the same period (10 days) for making such election.This 10-day time limit is consistent with longstanding title XVI continuedpayments policy based on <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly</T3>.If the election for continued benefits is requested after the 10-day period,we will use the standards in current regulations, 20 CFR 404.911, to determinewhether good cause exists for failing to request benefit continuation withinthe 10-day period. If the election bly conservative values (<T3>e.g., </T3>impossible assumptions) for those factors which lacked widelyaccepted standards. This combination of reasonable and unreasonable worst-caseassumptions resulted in an exposure assessment that is overly conservative.The petitioned waste passed this analysis for the dermal absorption pathway;therefore, the Agency concluded that exposure through dermal absorptionvia handling the composted waste is not likely to pose a threat to humanhealth.Title II benefits for a spouse or child, the spouse or child must alsorequest continued benefits within 10 days after receipt of the notificationof our determination. The standards in andSection; 404.911 will be used todetermine if good cause exists for the spouThe overall daily contact ratewould be 1.5 mg of soil per cm2 of exposed skin.\7\<NOTE/> This is a reasonable worst-case assumption.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ The determination of an overall daily contact rate wassuggested by EPA, <T3>Risk Analysis of TCDD Contamit andSection; 404. 1597a(i), in decisions(including court remand cases except those court remands with special benefitcontinuation rights under section 2(e) of Pub. L. 98-460) vacated and sentback (remanded) by the Appeals Council to an administrative law judge forfurther action, benefit continuation is available effective with the firstmonth of nonpayment based on the prior administrative law judge decisionif continued benefits were previously elected at the administrative lawjudge level.</T3>In such remanded cases, the prior administrative law judge's decision ordismissal order is vacated as having no force or effect, and accordinglybenefit continuation is again available for these title II beneficiaries.In these remanded cases, continued benefits wire composted waste; therewould be no dilution with ordinary topsoil. This is an absolute worst-caseassumption.<ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; All of the organic constituents present in soil that accumulateon an exposed person's skin would be absorbed. This is an absolute wnuationat the administrative law judge level, continuation of benefits is availableupon a new election by the beneficiary and effective for the month of theAppeals Council remand order.</ITAG>If benefit continuation was previously elected at the administrative lawjudge level, we will automatically reinstate these same continued benefitsand then update our records regarding events that may affect the rightto receive benefits. If any of these events have occurred, then continuedbenefits will be stopped or adjusted accordingly. If benefit continuationwas <T3>not </T3>previously elected at the administrative law judge level,we will verify whether all requirements are met <T3>before </T3>paying title II continued benefits. This updating of ourrecords before payment is necessary because benefit continuation is intendedto replace <T3>only </T3>those benefits received prior to the medical cessation, i.e.,benefits for <T3>only </T3>those individuals who were entitled at the time of the cessation.If any events that may affect the right to receive benefits have occurred,then necessary adjustments to the benefits will be made before reinstatement.Individuals who did <T3>not </T3>previously elect benefit continuation did not have to reportany of these events to us, since they were not receiving any benefits.The regulations at andSection; 404.1597a(j) explain that any title II continuedbenefits received during appeal (with the exception of Medicare benefits)are subject to the overpayment recovery and waiver provisions of regulationsat 20 CFR Part 404, Subpart F, if the determination that the title II individualis no longer disabled is not changed by the final decision of the Secretary.The title II individuals who received continued benefits would then beasked to pay back these benefits. However, recovery of the continued benefitswould be subject to the waiver provisions of regulations at 20 CFR Part404, Subpart F, only if the appeal was made in good faith. We will assumethat an appeal was made in good faith <T3>unless </T3>an individual fails to cooperate in connection with anappeals, e.g., if he or she fails (without a good reason) to give us medicalor other evidence, or to go for a physical or mental examination when requested.If an individual has an appeal on a medical cessation pending under bothtitle II and title XVI (that is, a concurrent case), the title II claimwill be handled in accordance with the title II regulations, while thetitle XVI claim will be handled in accordance with the title XVI regulations.Title XVIThe regulations at andSection; 416.995 explain that after we have made adetermination that an individual's physical or mental impairment(s) hasceased, never existed, or is no longer disabling, the individual's titleXVI benefits based on disability or blindness will be stopped. We willsend the title XVI individual written notice of our determination thatexplains it, the right to appeal and the right to request continued benefitspending reconsideration and/or a hearing on the disability/blindness cessationdetermination. Under these regulations, title XVI individuals who receive determinationson their applications for benefits based on disability or blindness thatthey were disabled or blind for only a specified period of time (i.e.,a closed period) do not have the right to request continuation of benefitsduring appeal. When disability has been established for only a specifiedperiod of time, there is no determination that would reach current status.Continuation of benefits during appeal is available only if current entitlementis in question. Also, under these regulations, title XVI individuals whoreceive an unfavorable determination on their application for benefitsbased on disability or blindness do not have the right to request continuationof benefits during appeal since continued benefits are only available toindividuals who were already receiving benefits. The regulations at andSection; 416.996(a) explain that title XVI individualswho receive a medical cessation determination may elect to have benefitscontinued during appeal of that determination. We have added language inthese final rules to show that these benefits include the special cashbenefits or special Supplemental Security Income (SSI) eligibility statusof Medicaid under andSection;andSection; 416.261 and 416.264. Section 416.996(a)applies to determinations that the individual's physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling made after October1984. The payments to a title XVI individual who has elected to have benefitscontinued will continue until the earlier of the month before the montha decision is issued after the administrative law judge hearing or themonth before the month a new decision is issued by the ALJ (or final actionis taken by the Appeals Council on the ALJ's recommended decision) if theindividual's case was sent back to an ALJ for further action, or untilthe month before the month no timely request for reconsideration or a hearingbefore an administrative law judge is pending after notification of anunfavorable title XVI initial or reconsideration cessation determination.Regulations at 20 CFR 416.1413(d), 51 FR 288 (January 3, 1986), which areeffective for reconsideration requests filed on or after January 3, 1986,provide a title XVI or concurrent title II/XVI beneficiary an opportunityfor a disability hearing at the reconsideration level when the beneficiaryappeals an initial medical cessation determination. Before January 3, 1986,the first level of appeal for title XVI or concurrent title II/XVI medicalcessations was a hearing before an administrative law judge. The disabilityhearing regulations result in similar treatment of title II and title XVIbeneficiaries in the appeals process, including the payment of continuedbenefits.Individuals electing continuation of title XVI benefits, in States whereMedicaid eligibility is based on receipt of title XVI benefits and forwhich SSA does Medicaid eligibility determinations, will also have Medicaideligibility continued. In other States, they will be referred to the StateMedicaid agency. To clarify our policy on cessation appeals filed under both title II andtitle XVI (a concurrent claim), we added new language to these final regulationsat andSection; 416.996(a). This new language does not represent a changein the concurrent claim policy which was announced in the NPRM. Althoughwe stated in the NPRM preamble how concurrent appeals would be processed,we had no statement on concurrent appeals in the rules themselves. We explainedin the preamble to the NPRM that in a concurrent claim, the title II appealis processed under the II rules and the title XVI appeal is processed underthe title XVI rules. In this final regulations, we have explicitly statedthis policy in the regulatory text at andSection; 416.996(a).The regulations at andSection; 416.996(b) explain that we will notify thetitle XVI individual of his or her right to elect continued benefits ifhe or she requests a reconsideration or hearing before an administrativelaw judge on our disability/blindness cessation determination. If the individualrequests a reconsideration or hearing, we will request a written statementof election as to whether or not he or she wants benefits to continue duringappeal. Title XVI individuals may elect continuation of benefits at the time reconsiderationis requested and again at the time a hearing before an administrative lawjudge is requested. A separate election must be made at each level of appeal.It the title XVI individual does not elect continuation of benefits atthe time reconsideration is requested, but requests it at the time theadministrative law judge hearing is requested, we will reinstate continuedbenefits effective with the month of the latest medical cessation determinationrather than the first month of nonpayment after the initial medical cessationdetermination. The written statement of choice, which must be completedby the individual, explains this provision. The regulations at andSection; 416.996(c) explain that a title XVI individualmust request continued benefits within 10 days after receiving notice ofan initial medical cessation determination along with requesting a reconsideration.The 60-day period for requesting a reconsideration is not affect by thisprovision. The new section 1631(a)(7) of the Act, as added by section 7 of Pub. L.98-460, requires that title XVI individuals now make an affirmative requestto have benefits continued. The existing title XVI regulation (20 CFR 416.1336(b)),which is based on the U.S. Supreme Court decision in the case of <T3>Goldberg v. </T3><T3>Kelly, </T3>provides that unless waived title XVI benefits would continueto be paid until a decision (or order of dismissal) was issued at the initiallevel of appeal if the appeal is filed within 10 days after receipt ofthe notice of planned action to stop benefits. The new statutory authorityfor title XVI benefit continuation differs from the <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly </T3>approach by requiring that the individual affirmativelyelect benefit continuation rather than assuming that the individual wantscontinued benefits if an appeal is requested within 10 days unless suchbenefits are waived. Under these regulations, title XVI individuals aregiven the same period (per current regulations) of 10 days from receiptof notice for making such election. Our experience with providing the 10-day time frame for filing a requestfor hearing and receiving benefit continuation in title XVI cases underthe <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly </T3>procedures, which has been in effect since 1974,has proven that this is an adequate time frame for most individuals. The title XVI regulations at andSection; 416.996(c) also explain that ifcontinued benefits are requested after the 10-day period, we will use thestandards in current regulations, 20 CFR 416.1411, to determine whethergood cause exists for failing to request benefit continuation within the10-day period. If the election for continued benefits is made late, wewill consider the request to be timely and will pay continued benefitsonly if good cause for delay is found. We apply a good cause exceptionwith regard to other time limits in the appeals process. For consistencyand recognizing that certain justifiable factors may prevent timely requestsin this situation, we are using the same good cause considerations here.The regulations at andSection; 416.996(d) explain that a title XVI individualmust request continued benefits within 10 days after receiving notice ofour reconsideration cessation determination along with requesting a hearingbefore an administrative law judge. The 60-day period for requesting ahearing is not affected by this provision.If the request for continued benefits is made after the 10-day period,we will use the standards in current regulations, 20 CFR 416.1411, to determinewhether good cause exists for failing to request benefit continuation timely.If the election for continued benefits is made late, we will consider therequest to be timely only if good cause for delay is found. The regulations at andSection; 416.996(e) explain that in title XVI decisions(including court remand cases, except those court remands with specialbenefit continuation rights under section 2(e) of Pub. L. 98-460) vacatedand sent back (remanded) by the Appeals Council to an administrative lawjudge for further action, benefit continuation may be available, withouta new election, effective with the first month of nonpayment based on theprior administrative law judge decision if benefits were previously electedat the administrative law judge level. In such title XVI remanded cases,the prior administrative law judge's decision or dismissal order is vacated,having no force or effect, and accordingly benefit continuation may beavailable again for these title XVI beneficiaries. If the title XVI beneficiary did not previously elect benefit continuationat the administrative law judge level, continuation of benefits may beavailable upon a new election by the beneficiary and effective for themonth of the Appeals Council remand order.Before reinstating benefits in any remand case (including court remandcases, except those court remands with special benefit continuation rightsunder section 2(e) of Pub. L. 98-460), we will contact the title XVI individualto update our records regarding events that affect the right to receive,and the amount of, benefits, such as work activity, living arrangements,income and resources. Before reinstatement, we will review and redetermineeligibility in all cases, whether or not benefits were previously electedat the administrative law judge level. This policy to do a redeterminationbefore reinstatement is consistent with our responsibility to redetermineeligibility contained in section 1611(c)(1) of the Act and the regulationsat 20 CFR 416.204. The redetermination is necessary because we have nothad recent contact with the individual during the period of nonpaymentsince the individual was not under any obligation to report changes incircumstances that could affect eligibility or payment amount. Since thetitle XVI program is a program based on current needs, it is essentialthat a determination be made that the individual's current needs supportthe payment, as well as the amount, of title XVI benefits. Upon redetermination,if all eligiblity factors are not met (other than disability or blindnessor, in certain cases, not engaging in substantial gainful activity), wewill not reinstate benefits. (Effective July 1, 1987, a title XVI individualwill no longer be subject to a trail work period or cessation based onengaging in substantial gainful activity in order to be eligible for specialbenefits under andSection; 416.261 or special status under andSection; 416.264).Any retroactive continued benefits paid to concurrent title II and titleXVI beneficiaries will be subject to the provisions of section 1127 ofthe Social Security Act, as amended. That section provides that, effectiveFebruary 1985, benefits paid after a period of suspension or terminationwill be adjusted to reflect the title XVI benefits that would not be paidif the title II benefits were paid when due.Prior to November 1984, in concurrent title II/title XVI medical cessationcases, under the provisions in 20 CFR 416.1336, an individual who had filedfor a hearing within 10 days of receipt of the cessation notice could waivehis or her right to receive continued benefits pending the hearing decision.He or she could also restrict this waiver to either title II <T3>or</T3> title XVI benefits only. Therefore the claimant could continueto receive benefits under both titles or choose to receive benefits underonly one title. This policy will be continued.For clarification, we added a new andSection; 416.996(f) to these final rules.This added regulation at andSection; 416.996(f) explains that title XVI recipientsof disability/blindness benefits whose benefits are suspended, reducedor terminated for reasons <T3>not</T3> connected with their medical condition still will be coveredunder the existing procedures (20 CFR 416.1336(b)) based on the decisionin <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly, </T3>which provides for the continuation of benefits throughthe first level of appeal when the appeal is requested within 10 days ofreceipt of the notice of suspension, reduction or termination.The regulations at andSection; 416.996(g) explain that any continued titleXVI benefits received during appeal are subject to the overpayment recoveryand waiver provisions of Regulations 20 CFR Part 416, Subpart E, if thedetermination that the title XVI individual is no longer disabled or blindis not changed by the final decision of the Secretary. The title XVI individualswho received continued benefits would then be asked to pay back these benefits.However, the continued benefits would be subject to the waiver provisionsof Regulations 20 CFR Part 416, Subpart E, only if the appeal was madein good faith. We will assume that an appeal was made in good faith<T3> unless</T3> an individual fails to cooperate in connection with anappeal, e.g., if he or she fails (without a good reason) to give us medicalor other evidence or to go for a physical or mental examination when requested.If an individual has an appeal on a medical cessation pending under bothtitle XVI and title II (that is, a concurrent case), the title XVI claimwill be handled in accordance with the title XVI regulations while thetitle II claim will be handled in accordance with the title II regulations.Conforming changes will be made later in 20 CFR 416.1336.<ITAG tagnum="84">Comments</ITAG>These rules were published as a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking at 51 FR18611 on May 21, 1986. We received comments from 13 respondents.Language and Format of Notices<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters expressed concern about the qualityand tone of our notices and forms used in the benefit continuation processand the attitudes of SSA employees responsible for presenting benefit continuationinformation to claimants. It was suggested that both written and oral informationbe presented in as simple a manner as possible. These commenters remarkedthat the language and format of the cessation notices can be critical inthe lives of people who are disabled, particularly those with mental disabilities.<T4>Response: </T4>We believe that the improvements we have made in thelanguage and format of our notices satisfies the concern about our writtencommunications. A major initiative of SSA is to issue clear and understandablenotices to claimants and other parties. As a part of this important initiative,we have developed new, improved standards for all SSA notices. In developingthese standards, SSA consulted with and adopted concepts from nongovernmentalauthorities on readability and communication. These standards reflect atone which we believe is personalized, courteous and nonthreatening.The notices of disability cessation have been revised to conform to theclear notice standards. The improved cessation notices consist of a streamlinedformat with clearer language. These notices contain explicit language aboutappeal rights <T3>and </T3>the right to elect continued benefits. The appeal paragraphincludes a sentence which reads ``Come to one of our offices if you wanthelp.'' Further, each notice concludes with a paragraph which encouragesthe claimant to contact any Social Security office if he or she has questionsabout his or her claim.In developing the language for the paragraph to explain the benefit continuationprovision, we avoided language that overemphasizes the beneficiary's obligationto repay continued benefits in the event of an unfavorable decision onappeal. The paragraph reads ``If you lose your appeal, you might have topay back some or all of this money.'' The notices use the word ``might''because overpayments which result from the election of continued benefitsare subject to the waiver consideration provisions of the Social SecurityAct if the appeal was made in good faith. In addition to the improvements in our written communications, we haveprovided training for Social Security office employees to improve theirinterviews and oral communication with claimants. Further, Social Securityoffice employees have been provided extensive training for more effectiveinterviewing of mentally impaired claimaints to ensure that their disabilityclaims are fully developed and that the process is understandable. <T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters suggested that the form for requestingreconsideration or hearing have a check-off box for requesting continuationof benefits. This would assure that Social Security office employees donot fail to present the option to elect continued benefits to the beneficiaryat the time he or she makes the request for appeal. <T3>Response: </T3>It is not necessary to revise the forms for requestingreconsideration or hearing to include benefit continuation boxes to ensurethat the option to elect continued benefits is presented to the beneficiarywhen he or she makes the request for appeal. The notice of the disability/blindnesscessation determination as well as the reconsideration determination informsa beneficiary of the right to have benefits continued during appeal ifhe or she disagrees with the determination and requests appeal. This informsthe beneficiary regarding his or her rights and also serves to put thebeneficiary at ease regarding possible financial hardship. Cessation casesare held in Social Security offices specifically to await the beneficiary'sresponse regarding continuation of benefits. Employees are instructed toexplain the continuation of benefits provision when a medical cessationappeal is requested. Finally, training is provided to Social Security officeemployees on how to explain the right to elect continued benefits to beneficiariesappealing cessation determinations as part of our continuing effort toprovide quality service to the public. Therefore, we do not believe that it is necessary to revise the forms forrequesting reconsideration or hearing to ensure that this option will beexplained to the claimant. 10-Day Time Limit To Request Benefit Continuation <T3>Comment: </T3>Eight of the 13 commenters were especially critical ofthe rule that a beneficiary whose disability or blindness has been foundto have ceased has only 10 days from receipt of the cessation notice torequest or elect to receive continued benefits while appealing the cessation.It was indicated that the 10-day time limit is too rigorous, burdensomeand is not required by the statute. The commenters believe that the 10-dayrule places a particular burden on mentally impaired individuals, and somesuggested that a provision be added to this rule to make it clear thatbeneficiaries with mental disabilities should receive extra considerationand be given more time to request continuation of benefits. Some thoughta 30-day time limit would be better, while others proposed a time limitof 60 days, the same amount of time allowed for requesting appeal. More specifically, in connection with the objection to this 10-day rule,several commenters recommended that these rules and the rules at 20 CFR404.911 and 416.1411 be amended to include specific language stating thatthe ``good cause'' for lateness provisions will be applied liberally formentally impaired beneficiaries. The commenters believe that such regulatorylanguage would accommodate the special circumstances which many mentallyimpaired beneficiaries experience which include difficulty in respondingto written communications, thus assuring that these individuals have thefull opportunity for having their benefits continued during appeal. Thesecommenters stated the SSA's flexibility in applying good cause is not readilyapparent in these rules.<T3>Response: </T3>Although many commenters voiced strong objection tothe 10-day rule, we did not amend the final rule to change this time limit.We believe, as we stated in the preamble to the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking,that the 10-day time limit is adequate time for beneficiaries to make anelection. In addition, as we also previously stated, we recognize thatcertain justifiable causes may prevent a beneficiary from making a timelyrequest for continued benefits, and therefore, in these situations we willapply the good cause exception applicable to other time limits in the appealsprocess. Section 2 of Pub. L. 97-455 and section 7 of Pub. L. 98-460 provide thatthe Secretary ``shall by regulations prescribe'' the manner, form, <T3>and time </T3>within which an individual may elect continued disabilitybenefits during appeal. For consistent program administration between title II and title XVI cases,these regulations provide the same 10-day period for having benefits continuedin connection with an appeal already provided by 20 CFR 416.1336(b) fortitle XVI suspension, reduction or termination cases. This 10-day timelimit is a longstanding policy which began with the policy and procedureswe provided for benefit continuation in title XVI cases, based on the principlesin the Supreme Court's decision in <T3>Goldberg v. Kelly. </T3>Under these procedures, as provided in 20 CFR416.1336(b), an individual who appealed an adverse action within the 10-daytime limit automatically received benefit continuation unless such benefitswere waived. We also followed a 10-day time limit policy in implementingcontinued benefits under title II, in accordance with section 2 of Pub.L. 97-455 which was enacted in 1983. Since we implemented this 10-day rule in title II cases under Pub. L. 97-455,the vast majority of the beneficiaries appealing a cessation have requestedthe continuation of benefits within 10 days. Therefore, we do not believethat the 10-day time limt, or our application of the good cause exception,has represented a disadvantage or disincentive for individuals whose benefitshave been ceased. In addition, we have had no indication that the use ofa 10-day rule has been a problem for claimants in title XVI cases, whereit has been used since 1974. We did not amend these rules to add specific language to give extra considerationto mentally impaired beneficiaries who miss the time limit for requestingcontinuation of benefits, because we believe that our current rules on``good cause'' for missing the deadline to request review provide for suchspecial consideration. Our regulations at 20 CFR 404.911 and 416.1411 providethat the deadline or time limit can be extended if the individual had ``goodcause'' for missing the deadline. These regulations cite examples of circumstanceswhen good cause may exist but state that the examples listed are not exclusive.One such example reads that good cause may be found if an individual ``wereseriously ill and were prevented from contacting us in person, in writing,or through a friend, relative, or other person.'' Another example readsthat ``good cause'' may be found if ``unusual or unavoidable circumstancesexist which show that you could not have known of the need to file timelyor which prevented you from filing timely.'' Although a mental disabilityis not specifically mentioned in these regulations, we believe the languageof 20 CFR 404.911 and 416.1411 covers a variety of circumstances includingthose which may be associated with mentally impaired individuals. ``Closed Period'' Cases Should Be Included for Benefit Continuation <T3>Comment: </T3>Six commenters indicated that claimants who are simultaneouslyawarded disability benefits for a prior period and whose entitlement oreligibility for benefits ceased at the end of such period, i.e., granteda closed period of disability, should be given the opportunity to electcontinuation of benefits during appeal of such closed period decisions.Several of these commenters pointed out that several medical improvementclass action court orders have required that ``closed period'' cases beregarded as <T3>cessation </T3>cases and accordingly be afforded the right to electcontinued benefits on appeal. The commenters also pointed out that ``closedperiod'' cases are adjudicted under the medical improvement review standardand, therefore, in this context should be recognized as medical cessationcases eligible for continued benefits.<T3>Response: </T3>We considered this comment and reexamined the rule toexclude ``closed period'' cases from benefit continuation. Upon reexamination,we concluded that this rule is consistent with the statute. Sections 223(g)and 1631(a)(7) as added by section 7 provide for benefit continuation to``recipients'' of title II or tile XVI benefits. The intent of section7 is to prevent disruption to those individuals who are currently recipientsof benefits and who then receive medical cessation determinations. Becauseindividuals granted a closed period were not already recipients of disabilitybenefits when their disabilities ceased, they are not eligible for benefitcontinuation. Further, a closed period of disability determination is adetermination on an application for benefits that establishes a periodof disability for only a specified period of time in the past. In a closedperiod of disability, there is no determination that would reach currentstatus. Continuation of benefits during appeal is available only if currententitlement is in question. Thus, we have not changed this rule. The medicalimprovement class actions referred to by the commenter are governed bysection 2(d) of Pub. L. 98-460. Section 2(d) provided for remand to theSecretary and review under the medical improvement review standard of certaincases pending in Federal courts. These final regulations do not apply totitle II and XVI cases remanded under section 2(d). The special benefitprovisions of section 2(e) apply to those cases.Claimant's Obligation To Repay Benefits Received During Cessation Appeal<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters questioned the procedures for collectingoverpayments resulting from an unfavorable decision on appeal. Specifically,the commenters believe that these rules do not go far enough to assurethat beneficiaries whose disability/blindness has been found to have ceasedfeel free to exercise their right to receive benefits during appeal withoutbeing intimidated by an overemphasis on the obligation to repay benefitsif the medical cessation is affirmed on appeal.<T3>Response: </T3>Currently the vast majority of those individuals whoappeal a cessation elect to receive continued benefits. There is no credibleevidence that beneficiaries are intimidated from electing benefits.Since the Act requires that continued benefits will be considered overpaymentsif the medical cessation is affirmed on appeal, we must inform the beneficiaryabout this requirement. We believe that the cessation determination noticewhich explains the determination and the benefit continuation provisiondoes not overemphasize this requirement, moreover, the notice explainsthat any resulting overpayment may receive waiver consideration.Social Security office employees are instructed to advise beneficiariesof their right to continued benefit payments and when the payments willend, as well as the consequences if more than the correct amount of paymentis made. This is standard procedure for all types of payments and not just``continued benefits'' payments. In addition, in contacts with beneficiaries,Social Security office employees provide information and assitance andare instructed not to intimidate or influence an individual.In conclusion, the policies and procedures for benefit continuation overpaymentcases are the same as those procedures for all overpayment cases. We areconfident that Social Security office employees will continue to providequality service in a courteous and nonthreatening manner.<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter proposed that these rules be amended toindicate that in addition to being eligible for regular overpayment waiverprovisions, that beneficiaries whose disability/blindness has been foundto have ceased also be eligible for a long-term repayment plan.<T3>Response: </T3>Although beneficiaries whose disability/blindness hasbeen found to have ceased may be eligible for a long-term repayment plan,it would not be appropriate to include rules on overpayments and collectionof overpayments in these benefit continuation rules.The regulations on overpayments and recovery and/or waiver of overpaymentsare found in 20 CFR 404.501 through 404.515 and 416.535 through 416.570.Processing and recovery of any overpayments due to continuation of benefitswill be made under procedures already in place.In addition to the above regulations, the Federal Claims Collection (FCC)standards, based on the Debt Collection Act of 1982 and issued jointlyby the General Accounting Office and the Department of Justice, set forththe national standards for the collection of debts owed the United Statesand its agencies. The FCC standards (4 CFR 102.1 through 120.20) providethat an agency discuss alternative methods of repayment with the debtor.FCC standards are contained in Department of Health and Human Servicesregulations, 45 CFR Part 30, the revised version of which is set forthat 52 FR 260 (January 5, 1987).The Social Security Administration follows the FCC standards for debt collection,and the overpayment notice(s) SSA sends complies with these standards.Our initial notice requesting repayment not only asks for refund, but advisesthe debtor if he or she cannot repay in a lump sum, to submit a plan forrepayment.Since debt collection standards are in 4 CFR 102.1 through 102.20, thereis no need to duplicate the repayment provisions in 20 CFR 404.501 through404.515 and 416.535 through 416.570.<T3>Comment: </T3>Several commenters indicated that these rules do notsufficiently discuss when SSA will begin collection of any resulting overpayment.It was suggested that ``these rules should state that SSA will not actto collect any funds alleged to be owed until such time as the individualhas exhausted his/her appeal rights.'' This would include deferring overpaymentcollection through the judicial (court) level of appeal.<T3>Response: </T3>As we stated earlier in response to the preceding comment,these regulations on the continuation of benefits during the appeal ofa medical cessation determination refer to the current overpayment rulesand the standards and procedures contained in these rules.In benefit continuation cases, our policy is that the notice of overpaymenton the amount of continued benefits paid will not be issued until any judicialappeal of the Secretary's final decision is completed. Therefore, the overpaymentcollection process is deferred to take into consideration possible judicialreview and reversal of the Secretary's decision. If the claimant does notseek judicial review of the cessation determination, we will issue theoverpayment notice and begin the collection process.<T3>Comment: </T3>One commenter recommended that these rules be modifiedto also allow recovery of Medicaid expenditures whenever State money wasexpended and the cessation determination was upheld on appeal. This commenterbelieves that since recovery of disability benefits is allowed when theclaimant loses the appeal, then States also should be allowed to recoverMedicaid expenditures when a title XVI cessation appeal is lost and a retroactivedetermination of ineligibility is made.<T3>Response: </T3>Section 1902(a)(10(A) of the Social Security Act requiresthat title-XVI-criteria States provide Medicaid to individuals receivingtitle XVI payments. In this regard, Medicaid eligibility is conditionalbased on the receipt of title XVI <T3>payments, </T3>not title XVI <T3>eligibility. </T3>As long as a title XVI payment is made, the Stateis acting appropriately when it provides Medicaid to a title XVI recipient.When a title XVI recipient is determined retroactively ineligible for benefitsunder title XVI, his or her eligibility for Medicaid during that retroactiveperiod is not at issue as long as a title XVI payment was made. Regardlessof why the individual has remained in payment status (e.g., <T3>Goldberg </T3>v. <T3>Kelly </T3>payment continuation or continuation of benefits duringdisability/blindness cessation appeal), if SSA provided a title XVI payment,the State's providing Medicaid was proper and is unaffected by a retroactivetitle XVI disallowance.However, an exception to this may apply in cases involving retroactiveineligibility determinations. Medicaid recovery is not allowed <T3>unless </T3>Medicaid eligibility was established by fraud or similarfault on the part of the individual. If Medicaid eligibility was establishedfraudulently, then the State must attempt to collect or recover medicalexpenditures from the individual.Election of Continued Benefits for Title II Auxiliary Beneficiaries (Spouseor Children)<T3>Comment:</T3> Five commenters objected to the requirement that auxiliarybeneficiaries also make a separate written election to receive continuationof benefits during the wage earner's appeal. These commenters believe thatthe statute does not permit or require a separate election from auxiliarybeneficiaries. Hence, it was suggested that these rules require only thewage earner's election, without an additional obstacle and more paperwork.<T3>Response:</T3> We have decided not to eliminate the rule for obtainingseparate elections from auxiliary beneficiaries. As we previously explainedin the NPRM, title II auxiliary beneficiaries who are living in a separatehousehold and those in the wage earner's household will be asked to repayany overpayment resulting from an unfavorable decision on appeal. Sincethese beneficiaries may not be aware of the wage earner's election of continuedbenefits on their behalf, a separate statement of choice is required. Havingto make a separate election does not place any added liability on the auxiliaries,rather it serves to give the auxiliaries the chance to choose for themselveswhether or not they wish to receive continued benefits. Although the statutedoes not specifically mention auxiliary beneficiaries' electing to receivecontinued benefits, we believe our policy reflects a reasonable interpretationof the statute and is consistent with its intent which is to prevent disruptionto recipients of benefits during appeal of a medical cessation determination.Election of Continued Benefits on Behalf of New Auxiliary Beneficiaries<T3>Comment: </T3>Two commenters requested that we clarify these ruleswith respect to the right of new auxiliary beneficiaries to receive continuedbenefits. In this context, new auxiliaries or ``after-acquired auxiliaries''refers to those auxiliary beneficiaries who were not entitled and receivingbenefits when the wage earner's benefits were initially ceased, but subsequentlyfiled for benefits during the wage earner's appeal of the cessation. Thecommenters indicated that these rules incorrectly excluded new auxiliarybeneficiaries, violating congressional intent and the ``spirit'' of thestatute.<T3>Response:</T3> We can appreciate this comment and the concern for theseindividuals. However, these rules do not extend the right to receive continuedbenefits to new (after-acquired) auxiliaries. ``Benefit continuation,''as provided by law, is intended to replace only those benefits receivedprior to the medical cessation. In other words, benefits would be <T3>continued</T3> for only those individuals who were recipients at thetime of the cessation determination. After-acquired auxiliaries were notrecipients of benefits at the time of the cessation determination.Making a New Written Election at Each Level of Appeal<T3>Comment:</T3> Two commenters objected to the rule to require a newelection for continued benefits at each level of appeal. The commentersstated that this was an unnecessary burden for the wage earner and auxiliarybeneficiaries, and proposed that we <T3>automatically </T3>continue benefits with the option to <T3>decline </T3>continued benefits on appeals, as 20 CFR 416.1336(b) currentlyprovides during an appeal of an adverse title XVI action.<T3>Response:</T3> The Act provides that the beneficiary may elect (i.e.,choose) to receive continued benefits while pursuing an appeal of a medicalcessation decision. To provide for automatic continuation of benefits withoutsuch election would be inconsistent with this statutory provision.Administratively, we require a separate election at each level of appealrather than have the claimant's first choice (election or waiver) remainin effect for all subsequent levels of appeal. This requirement affordsa second chance to elect continued benefits to each claimant who waivedor declined continued benefits when the reconsideration was requested,if he or she should lose the reconsideration appeal. Also, this providesanother opportunity for us to discuss the nature of continued benefitsand the claimant's responsibility to report changes that could affect paymentof these benefits. This may be necessary since the claimant may believethat since he or she was sent a notice of cessation, he or she may notbe under any obligation to report changes in circumstances that affectreceipt of benefits. Further, this review is consistent with our responsibilityto periodically advise the claimant of his or her rights and responsibilities.Finally, submitting a new election at each level of appeal is not significantlyburdensome, since the claimant must contact us if he or she wishes to requestan appeal. Therefore, we have retained the provision to require that theclaimant renew his or her election each time a new appeal is requested.Statement To Decline or Waive Continued Benefits<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter objected to the rule to require a statementto waive or decline receipt of continued benefits during appeal. The commentersuggested that we delete all references to securing a waiver statementas the statute requires only an <T3>election</T3> statement.<T3>Response:</T3> Although the statute provides for the right to <T3>elect</T3> continued benefits, we have also required that the beneficiaryand/or auxiliary beneficiaries indicate in writing when they do not wishto receive continued benefits pending a decision on the medical cessationappeal. It is important that the beneficiary fully understand the effectof this action and remember the choice made, since a waiver of continuedbenefits is binding through that particular level of appeal.Benefit Continuation for Title XVI ``Blindness'' Cessations<T3>Comment:</T3> One commenter indicated that these rules do not specificallymention ``blindness'' cessations. Title XVI disability recipients are categorizedas <T3>blind</T3> or <T3>disabled</T3>. It was suggested that these rules ensure that blindbeneficiaries be able to elect continuation of benefits during cessationappeal.<T3>Response: </T3>In the preamble to the NPRM for title XVI, we explainedthat under these rules title XVI beneficiaries whose benefits based ondisability or blindness are stopped because of a medical cessation wouldbe eligible to elect continued benefits during appeal of the cessation.However, we agree with this suggestion and we have made the appropriatechanges. We amended the final rules in andSection;andSection; 416.995 and 416.996to read ``disability or blindness'' benefits based on a physical or mentalimpairment, rather than ``benefits'' based on a physical or mental impairment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Procedures</ITAG>Executive Order 12291The Secretary has determined that this is not a major rule under ExecutiveOrder 12291 because it will not have an annual effect on the economy of$100 million and will not cause increases in costs or prices. The programcost associated with these final regulations is estimated to be $60 millionin fiscal year 1988. Therefore, a regulatory impact analysis is not required.Paperwork Reduction ActThese regulations impose no new reporting or recordkeeping requirementsrequiring Office of Management and Budget clearance.Regulatory Flexibility ActWe certify that these regulations will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities because they affect onlyindividuals. Therefore, a regulatory flexibility analysis as provided inPub. L. 96-354, the Regulatory Flexibility Act, is not required.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Programs: No. 13.803 SocialSecurity Retirement Insurance)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>20 CFR Part 404Administrative practice and procedure; Death benefits; Disability benefits;Old-age, survivors and disability insurance.20 CFR Part 416Administrative practice and procedure, Aged, Blind, Disability benefits,Public assistance programs, Supplemental Security Income (SSI).<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: April 28, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Dorcas R. Hardy,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Social Security.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: June 20, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of Health and Human Services.</ITAG>Subpart P of Part 404 of Chapter III of Title 20 of the Code of FederalRegulations is amended to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 404_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Subpart P is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 202, 205 (a), (b), and (d)-(h), 216(i), 221 (a)and (i), 222(c), 223, 225, and 1102 of the Social Security Act; 42 U.S.C.402, 405 (a), (b), and (d)-(h), 416(i), 421(a) and (i), 422(c), 423, 425,and 1302; Sec. 505 (a) of Pub. L. 96-265, 94 Stat. 473, Secs. 2(d)(2),5, 6, and 15 of Pub. L. 98-460, 98 Stat. 1797, 1801, 1802, and 1808, Sec.9009 of Pub. L. 100-203, 100 Stat. </ITAG>2. The text of existing andSection; 404.1597 is redesignated paragraph (a)<T3>General</T3> and a new paragraph (b) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 404.1597</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">After we make a determination that you are not now disabled.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> * * *(b) <T3>If we make a determination that your physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, did not exist, or is no longer disabling (Medical CessationDetermination). </T3>If we make a determination that the physical or mentalimpairment(s) on the basis of which benefits were payable has ceased, didnot exist, or is no longer disabling (a medical cessation determination,your benefits will stop. As described in paragraph (a) of this section,you will receive a written notice explaining this determination and themonth your benefits will stop. The written notice will also explain yourright to appeal if you disagree with our determination and your right torequest that your benefits and the benefits, if any, of your spouse orchildren, be continued under andSection; 404.1597a. For the purpose of thissection, ``benefits'' means disability cash payments and/or Medicare, ifapplicable. The continued benefit provisions of this section do not applyto an initial determination on an application for disability benefits,or to a determination that you were disabled only for a specified periodof time.3. In Part 404, Subpart P, a new andSection; 404.1597a is added to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 404.1597a</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continued benefits pending appeal of a medical cessation determination.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>If we determine that you are not entitled to benefitsbecause the physical or mental impairment(s) on the basis of which suchbenefits were payable is found to have ceased, not to have existed, orto no longer be disabling, and you appeal that determination, you may chooseto have your benefits continued pending reconsideration and/or a hearingbefore an administrative law judge on the disability cessation determination.For the purpose of this entire section, the election of ``continued benefits''means the election of disability cash payments and/or Medicare, if applicable.You can also choose to have the benefits continued for anyone else receivingbenefits based on your wages and self-employment income (and anyone elsereceiving benefits because of your entitlement to benefits based on disability).If you appeal a medical cessation under both title II and title XVI (aconcurrent case), the title II claim will be handled in accordance withtitle II regulations while the title XVI claim will be handled in accordancewith the title XVI regulations.(b) <T3>The provisions of this section are available for a limited time only.</T3>(1) Benefits may be continued under this section only if the determinationthat your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed,or is no longer disabling is made on or after January 12, 1983 (or beforeJanuary 12, 1983, and a timely request for reconsideration or a hearingbefore an administrative law judge is pending on that date), and beforeJanuary 1, 1989.(2) Benefits may be continued under this section only for months beginningwith January 1983, or the first month for which benefits are no longerotherwise payable following our determination that your physical or mentalimpairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling,whichever is later.(3) Continued payment of benefits under this section will stop effectivewith the earlier of: (i) The month before the month in which an administrativelaw judge's hearing decision finds that your physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling or the month beforethe month of a new administrative law judge decision (or final action bythe Appeals Council on the administrative law judge's recommended decision)if your case was sent back to an administrative law judge for further action;or (ii) the month before the month no timely request for a reconsiderationor a hearing before an administrative law judge is pending; or (iii) June1989. These continued benefits may be stopped or adjusted because of certainevents (such as work and earning or receipt of worker's compensation) whichoccur while you are receiving these continued benefits and affect yourright to receive continued benefits.(c) <T3>Continuation of benefits for anyone else pending your appeal. </T3>(1)When you file a request for reconsideration or hearing before an administrativelaw judge on our determination that your physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling, or your casehas been sent back (remanded) to an administrative law judge for furtheraction, you may also choose to have benefits continue for anyone else whois receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employment income (andfor anyone else receiving benefits because of your entitlement to benefitsbased on disability), pending the outcome of your appeal.(2) If anyone else is receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employmentincome, we will notify him or her of the right to choose to have his orher benefits continue pending the outcome of your appeal. Such benefitscan be continued for the time period in paragraph (b) of this section onlyif he or she chooses to have benefits continued and you also choose tohave his or her benefits continued.(d) <T3>Statement of choice. </T3>When you or another party request reconsiderationunder andSection;404.908(a) or a hearing before an administrative law judgeunder andSection;404.932(a) on our determination that your physical or mentalimpairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling,or if your case is sent back (remanded) to an administrative law judgefor further action, we will explain your right to receive continued benefitsand ask you to complete a statement specifying which benefits you wishto have continued pending the outcome of the reconsideration or hearingbefore an administrative law judge. You may elect to receive only Medicarebenefits during appeal even if you do not want to receive continued disabilitybenefits. if anyone else is receiving benefits based on your wages andself-employment income (or because of your entitlement to benefits basedon disability), we will ask you to complete a statement specifying whichbenefits you wish to have continued for them, pending the outcome of therequest for reconsideration or hearing before an administrative law judge.If you request appeal but you do not want to receive continued benefits,we will ask you to complete a statement declining continued benefits indicatingthat you do not want to have your benefits and those of your family, ifany, continued during the appeal. (e) <T3>Your spouse's or children's statement of choice. </T3>If you request,in accordance with paragraph (d) of this section, that benefits also becontinued for anyone who had been receiving benefits based on your wagesand self-employment, we will send them a written notice. The notice willexplain their rights and ask them to complete a statement either decliningcontinued benefits, or specifying which benefits they wish to have continued,pending the outcome of the request for reconsideration or a hearing beforean administrative law judge. (f) <T3>What you must do to receive continued benefits pending notice of ourreconsideration determination. </T3>(1) If you want to receive continuedbenefits pending the outcome of your request for reconsideration, you mustrequest reconsideration and continuation of benefits no later than 10 daysafter the date you receive the notice of our initial determination thatyour physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, oris no longer disabling. Reconsideration must be requested as provided inandSection;404.909, and you must request continued benefits using a statementin accordance with paragraph (d) of this section. (2) If you fail to request reconsideration and continued benefits withinthe 10-day period required by paragraph (f)(1) of this section, but laterask that we continue your benefits pending a reconsidered determination,we will use the rules in andSection;404.911 to determine whether good causeexists for your failing to request benefit continuation within 10 daysafter receipt of the notice of the initial cessation determination. Ifyou request continued benefits after the 10-day period, we will considerthe request to be timely and will pay continued benefits only if good causefor delay is established. (g) <T3>What you must do to receive continued benefits pending an administrativelaw judge's decision. </T3>(1) To receive continued benefits pending anadministrative law judge's decision on our reconsideration determination,you must request a hearing and continuation of benefits no later than 10days after the date you receive the notice of our reconsideration determinationthat your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed,or is no longer disabling. A hearing must be requested as provided in andSection;404.933,and you must request continued benefits using a statement in accordancewith paragraph (d) of this section. (2) If you request continued benefits pending an administrative law judge'sdecision but did not request continued benefits while we were reconsideringthe initial cessation determination, your benefits will begin effectivethe month of the reconsideration determination. (3) If you fail to request continued payment of benefits within the 10-dayperiod required by paragraph (g)(1) of this section, but you later askthat we continue your benefits pending an administrative law judge's decisionon our reconsidered determination, we will use the rules as provided inandSection;404.911 to determine whether good cause exists for your failingto request benefit continuation within 10 days after receipt of the reconsiderationdetermination. If you request continued benefits after the 10-day period,we will consider the request to be timely and will pay continued benefitsonly if good cause for delay is established. (h) <T3>What anyone else must do to receive continued benefits pending ourreconsideration determination or an administrative law judge's decision.</T3>(1) When you or another party (see andSection;andSection;404.908(a) and404.932(a)) request a reconsideration or a hearing before an administrativelaw judge on our medical cessation determination or when your case is sentback (remanded) to an administrative law judge for further action, youmay choose to have benefits continue for anyone else who is receiving benefitsbased on your wages and self-employment income. An eligible individualmust also choose whether or not to have his or her benefits continue pendingyour appeal by completing a separate statement of election as describedin paragraph (e) of this section. (2) He or she must request continuation of benefits no later than 10 daysafter the date he or she receives notice of termination of benefits. Heor she will then receive continued benefits beginning with the later ofJanuary 1983, or the first month for which benefits are no longer otherwisepayable following our initial or reconsideration determination that yourphysical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, or is nolonger disabling. Continued benefits will continue until the earlier of:(i) The month before the month in which an administrative law judge's hearingdecision finds that your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, hasnever existed, or is no longer disabling or the month before the monthof the new administrative law judge decision (or final action is takenby the Appeals Council on the administrative law judge's recommended decision)if your case was sent back to an administrative law judge for further action;or (ii) the month before the month no timely request for a reconsiderationor a hearing before an administrative law judge is pending; or (iii) June1989. These continued benefits may be stopped or adjusted because of certainevents (such as work and earnings or payment of workers compensation) whichoccur while an eligible individual is receiving continued benefits andaffect his or her right to receive continued benefits.(3) If he or she fails to request continuation of benefits within the 10-dayperiod required by this paragraph, but requests continuation of benefitsat a later date, we will use the rules as provided in andSection; 404.911to determine whether good cause exists for his or her failure to requestcontinuation of benefits within 10 days after receipt of the notice oftermination of his or her benefits. His or her late request will be consideredto be timely and we will pay him or her continued benefits only if goodcause for delay is established.(4) If you choose not to have benefits continued for anyone else who isreceiving benefits based on your wages and self-employment income, pendingthe appeal on our determination, we will not continue benefits to him orher.(i) <T3>What you must do when you case is remanded to an administrative lawjudge. </T3>If we send back (remand) your case to an administrative lawjudge for futher action under the rules provided in andSection; 404.977,and the administrative law judge's decision or dismissal order issued onyou medical cessation appeal is vacated and is no longer in effect, continuedbenefits are payable pending a new decision by the administrative law judgeor final action is taken by the Appeals Council on the administrative lawjudge's recommended decision.(1) If you (and anyone else receiving benefits based on your wages andself-employment income or because of your disability) previously electedto receive continued benefits pending the administrative law judge's decision,we will automatically start these same continued benefits again. We willsend you a notice telling you this, and that you do not have to do anythingto have these same benefits continued until the month before the monththe new decision of order of dismissal is issued by the administrativelaw judge or until the month before the month the Appeals Council takesfinal action on the administrative law judge's recommended decision. Thesebenefits will begin again with the first month of nonpayment based on theprior administrative law judge hearing decision or dismissal order. Ournotice explaining reinstatement of continued benefits will also tell youto report to us any changes or events that affect your receipt of benefits.(2) After we automatically reinstate your continued benefits as describedin paragraph (h)(1) of this section, we will contact you to determine ifany adjustment is required to the amount of continued benefits payabledue to events that affect the right to receive benefits involving you,your spouse and/or children. If you have returned to work, we will requestadditional information about this work activity. If you are working, yourcontinued benefits will not be stopped while your appeal of the medicalcessation of disability is still pending unless you have completed a trialwork period and are engaging in substantial gainful activity. In this event,we will suspend your continued benefits. If any other changes have occurredwhich would require a reduction in benefits amounts, or nonpayment of benefits,we will send an advance notice to advise of any adverse change before theadjustment action is taken. The notice will also advise you of the rightto explain why these benefits should not be adjusted or stopped. You willalso receive a witten notice of our determination. The notice will alsoexplain your right to reconsideration if you disagree with this determination.(3) If the final decision on your appeal of your medical cessation is afavorable one, we will send you a written notice in which we will adviseyou of your right to benefits, if any, before you engaged in substantialgainful activity and to reentitlement should you stop performing substantialgainful activity. If you disagree with our determination, you will havethe right to appeal this decision.(4) If the final decision on your appeal of your medical cessation is anunfavorable one (the cessation is affirmed), you will also be sent a writtennotice advising you of our determination, and your right to appeal if youthink we are wrong.(5) If you (or the others receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employmentincome or because of your disability) did not previously elect to havebenefits continued pending an administrative law judge decision, and younow want to elect continued benefits, you must request to do so no laterthan 10 days after you receive our notice telling you about continued benefits.If you fail to request continued benefits within the 10-day period requiredby paragraph (f)(1) of this section, but later ask that we continue yourbenefits pending an administrative law judge remand decision, we will usethe rules in andSection;404.911 to determine whether good cause exists foryour failing to request benefit continuation within 10 days after receiptof the notice telling you about benefit continuation. We will considerthe request to be timely and will pay continued benefits only if good causefor delay is established. If you make this new election, benefits may beginwith the month of the order sending (remanding) your case back to the administrativelaw judge. Before we begin to pay you continued benefits as described inparagraph (h)(1) of this section we will contact you to determine if anyadjustment is required to the amount of continued benefits payable dueto events which may affect your right to benefits. If you have returnedto work, we will request additional information about this work activity.If you are working, continued benefits may be started and will not be stoppedbecause of your work while your appeal of the medical cessation of yourdisability is still pending unless you have completed a trial work periodand are engaging in substantial gainful activity. If any changes have occurredwhich establish a basis for not paying continued benefits or a reductionin benefit amount, we will send you a notice explaining the adjustmentor the reason why we cannot pay continued benefits. The notice will alsoexplain your right to reconsideration if you disagree with this determination.If the final decision on your appeal of your medical cessation is a favorableone, we will send you a written notice in which we will advise you of yourright to benefits, if any, before you engaged in substantial gainful activityand to reentitlement should you stop performing substantial gainful activity.If you disagree with our determination, you will have the right to appealthis decision. If the final decision on your appeal of your medical cessationis an unfavorable one (the cessation is affirmed), you will also be senta written notice advising you of our determination, and your right to appealif you think we are wrong. (6) If a court orders that your case be sent back to us (remanded) andyour case is sent to an administrative law judge for further action underthe rules provided in andSection;404.983, the administrative law judge'sdecision or dismissal order on your medical cessation appeal is vacatedand is no longer in effect. Continued benefits are payable to you and anyoneelse receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employment incomeor because of your disability pending a new decision by the administrativelaw jduge or final action is taken by the Appeals Council on the administrativelaw judge's recommended decision. In these court-remanded cases reachingthe administrative law judge, we will follow the same rules provided inparagraphs (i) (1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section. (j) <T3>Responsibility to pay back continued benefits. </T3>(1) If the finaldecision of the Secretary affirms the determination that you are not entitledto benefits, you will be asked to pay back any continued benefits you receive.However, as described in the overpayment recovery and waiver provisionsof Subpart F of this Part, you will have the right to ask that you notbe required to pay back the benefits. You will not be asked to pay backany Medicare benefits you received during the appeal. (2) Anyone else receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employmentincome (or because of your disability) will be asked to pay back any continuedbenefits he or she received if the determination that your physical ormental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling,is not changed by the final decision of the Secretary. However, he or shewill have the right to ask that he or she not be required to pay them back,as described in the overpayment recovery and waiver provisions of SubpartF of this Part. He or she will not be asked to pay back any Medicare benefitshe or she received during the appeal. (3) Waiver of recovery of an overpayment resulting from the continued benefitspaid to you or anyone else receiving benefits based on your wages and self-employmentincome (or because of your disability) may be considered as long as thedetermination was appealed in good faith. It will be assumed that suchappeal is made in good faith and, therefore, any overpaid individual hasthe right to waiver consideration <T3>unless</T3> such individual fails to cooperate in connection with theappeal, e.g., if the individual fails (without good reason) to give usmedical or other evidence we request, or to go for a physical or mentalexamination when requested by us, in connection with the appeal. Subpart I of Part 416 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations isamended to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 416_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Subpart I is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1614(a), 1619, and 1631(a) and (d)(1),and 1633 of the Social Security Act; 42 U.S.C. 1302, 1382c(2), 1382h, 1383(2)and (d)(1), and 1383b; Secs. 2, 5, 6, and 15 of Pub. L. 98-460, 98 Stat.1794, 1801, 1802, and 1808.</ITAG>2. Section 416. 995 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 416.995</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">If we make a determination that your physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, did not exist or is no longer disabling (Medical CessationDetermination).</ITAG>If we make a determination that the physical or mental impairment(s) onthe basis of which disability or blindness benefits were payable has ceased,did not exist or is no longer disabling (a medical cessation determination),your benefits will stop. You will receive a written notice explaining thisdetermination and the month your benefits will stop. The written noticewill also explain your right to appeal if you disagree with our determinationand your right to request that your disability or blindness benefits becontinued under andSection; 416.996. The continued benefit provisions ofthis section do not apply to an initial determination on an applicationfor disability or blindness benefits or to a determination that you weredisabled or blind only for a specified period of time.3. In Part 416, Subpart I, a new andSection; 416.996 is added to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 416.996</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continued disability or blindness benefits pending appeal of a medicalcessation determination.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>If we determine that you are not eligible for disabilityor blindness benefits because the physical or mental impairment(s) on thebasis of which such benefits were payable is found to have ceased, notto have existed, or to no longer be disabling, and you appeal that determination,you may choose to have your disability or blindness benefits, includingspecial cash benefits or special SSI eligibility status under andSection;andSection;416.261 and 416.264, continued pending reconsideration and/or a hearingbefore an administrative law judge on the disability/blindness cessationdetermination.If you appeal a medical cessation under both title II and title XVI (aconcurrent case), the title II claim will be handled in accordance withtitle II regulations while the title XVI claim will be handled in accordancewith the title XVI regulations.(1) Benefits may be continued under this section only if the determinationthat your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed,or is no longer disabling is made after October 1984.(2) Continued benefits under this section will stop effective with theearlier of: (i) The month before the month in which an administrative lawjudge's hearing decision finds that your physical or mental impairment(s)has ceased, has never existed, or is no longer disabling or the month beforethe month of a new administrative law judge decision (or final action istaken by the Appeals Council on the administrative law judge's recommendeddecision) if your case was sent back to an administrative law judge forfurther action; or (ii) the month before the month in which no timely requestfor reconsideration or administrative law judge hearing is pending afternotification of our initial or reconsideration cessation determination.These benefits may be stopped or adjusted because of certain events (suchas, change in income or resources or your living arrangements) which mayoccur while you are receiving these continued benefits, in accordance withandSection; 416.1336(b).(b) <T3>Statement of choice. </T3>If you or another party (see andSection; 416.1432(a))request reconsideration under andSection; 416.1409 or a hearing before anadministrative law judge in accordance with andSection; 416.1433 on our determinationthat your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed,or is no longer disabling, or if your case is sent back (remanded) to anadministrative law judge for further action, we will explain your rightto receive continued benefits and ask you to complete a statement indicatingthat you wish to have benefits continued pending the outcome of the reconsiderationor administrative law judge hearing. If you request reconsideration and/orhearing but you do not want to receive continued benefits, we will askyou to complete a statement declining continued benefits indicating thatyou do not want to have your benefits continued during the appeal. A separateelection must be made at each level of appeal. (c) <T3>What you must do to receive continued benefits pending notice of ourreconsideration determination. </T3>(1) If you want to receive continuedbenefits pending the outcome of your request for reconsideration, you mustrequest reconsideration and continuation of benefits no later than 10 daysafter the date you receive the notice of our initial determination thatyour physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed, oris no longer disabling. Reconsideration must be requested as provided inandSection; 416.1409, and you must request continued benefits using a statementin accordance with paragraph (b) of this section. (2) If you fail to request reconsideration and continued benefits withinthe 10-day period required by paragraph (c)(1) of this section, but laterask that we continue your benefits pending a reconsidered determination,we will use the rules in andSection; 416.1411 to determine whether good causeexists for your failing to request benefit continuation within 10 daysafter receipt of the notice of the initial cessation determination. Ifyou request continued benefits after the 10-day period, we will considerthe request to be timely and will pay continued benefits only if good causefor delay is established. (d) <T3>What you must do to receive continued benefits pending an administrativelaw judge's decision. </T3>(1) To receive continued benefits pending anadministrative law judge's decision on our reconsideration determination,you must request a hearing and continuation of benefits no later than 10days after the date you receive the notice of our reconsideration determinationthat your physical or mental impairment(s) has ceased, has never existed,or is no longer disabling. A hearing must be requested as provided in andSection;416.1433, and you must request continued benefits using a statement inaccordance with paragraph (b) of this section. (2) If you fail to request a hearing and continued benefits within the10-day period required under paragraph (d)(1) of this section, but youlater ask that we continue your benefits pending an administrative lawjudge's decision, we will use the rules as provided in andSection; 416.1411to determine whether good cause exists for your failing to request benefitcontinuation within 10 days after receipt of the reconsideration determination.If you request continued benefits after the 10-day period, we will considerthe delayed request to be timely and will pay continued benefits only ifgood cause for delay is established. (e) <T3>What you must do when your case is remanded to an administrative lawjudge. </T3>If we send back (remand) your case to an administrative lawjudge for further action under the rules provided in andSection; 416.1477,and the administrative law judge's decision or dismissal order issued onyour medical cessation appeal is vacated and is no longer in effect, youmay be eligible for continued benefits pending a new decision by the administrativelaw judge or final action by the Appeals Council on the administrativelaw judge's recommended decision.(1) When your case is remanded to an administrative law judge, and youhave elected to receive continued benefits, we will contact you to updateour file to verify that you continue to meet the nonmedical requirementsto receive benefits based on disability or blindness. To determine yourcorrect payment amount, we will ask you to provide information about eventssuch as changes in living arrangements, income, or resources since ourlast contact with you. If you have returned to work, we will request additionalinformation about this work activity. Unless your earnings cause your incometo be too much to receive benefits, your continued benefits will be paidwhile your appeal of the medical cessation of your disability/blindnessis still pending, unless you have completed a trial work period and areengaging in substantial gainful activity. If you have completed a trialwork period and previously received continued benefits you may still beeligible for special cash benefits under andSection; 416.261 or special SSIeligibility status under andSection; 416.264. (Effective July 1, 1987, atitle XVI individual is no longer subject to a trial work period or cessationbased on engaging in substantial gainful activity in order to be eligiblefor special benefits under andSection; 416.261 or special status under andSection;416.264.) If we determine that you no longer meet a requirement to receivebenefits, we will send you a written notice. The written notice will explainwhy your continued benefits will not be reinstated or will be for an amountless than you received before the prior administrative law judge's decision.The notice will also explain your right to reconsideration under andSection;416.1407, if you disagree. If you request a reconsideration, you will havethe chance to explain why you believe your benefits whould be reinstatedor should be at a higher amount. If the final decision on your appeal ofyour medical cessation is a favorable one, we will send you a written noticein which we will advise you of any right to reentitlement to benefits includingspecial benefits under andSection; 416.261 or special status under andSection;416.264. If you disagree with our determination on your appeal, you willhave the right to appeal this decision.(2) After we verify that you meet all the nonmedical requirements to receivebenefits as stated in paragraph (e)(1) of this section, and if you previouslyelected to receive continued benefits pending the administrative law judge'sdecision, we will start continued benefits again. We will send you a noticetelling you this. You do not have to complete a request to have these samebenefits continued through the month before the month the new decisionor order of dismissal is issued by the administrative law judge or throughthe month before the month the Appeals Council takes final action on theadministrative law judge's recommended decision. These continued benefitswill begin again with the first month of nonpayment based on the prioradministrative law judge hearing decision or dismissal order. Our noticeexplaining continued benefits will also tell you to report to us any changesor events that affect your receipt of benefits. (3) When your case is remanded to an administrative law judge, and if youdid <T3>not </T3>previously elect to have benefits continued pending an administrativelaw judge decision, we will send you a notice telling you that if you wantto change that election, you must request to do so no later than 10 daysafter you receive our notice. If you do make this new election, and afterwe verify that you meet all the nonmedical requirements as explained inparagraph (e)(1) of this section, benefits will begin with the month ofthe Appeals Council remand order and will continue as stated in paragraph(e)(2) of this section. (4) If a court orders that your case be sent back to us (remanded) andyour case is sent to an administrative law judge for further action underthe rules provided in andSection; 416.1483, the administrative law judge'sdecision or dismissal order on your medical cessation appeal is vacatedand is no longer in effect. You may be eligible for continued benefitspending a new decision by the administrative law judge or final actionby the Appeals Council on the administrative law judge's recommended decision.In these court-remanded cases reaching the administrative law judge, wewill follow the same rules provided in paragraph (e) (1), (2), and (3)of this section. (f) <T3>What if your benefits are suspended, reduced or terminated for otherreasons. </T3>If we determine that your payments should be reduced, suspendedor terminated for reasons not connected with your medical condition (seeSubpart M of Regulations No. 16) benefits may be continued under the proceduredescribed in andSection; 416.1336. (g) <T3>Responsibility to pay back continued benefits. </T3>(1) If the finaldecision of the Secretary affirms the determination that you are not entitledto benefits, you will be asked to pay back any continued benefits you receive.However, you will have the right to ask that you not be required to payback the benefits as described in the overpayment recovery and waiver provisionsof Subpart E of this Part. (2) Waiver of recovery of an overpayment resulting from continued benefitsto you may be considered as long as the cessation determination was appealedin good faith. We will assume that your appeal was made in good faith and,therefore, you have the right to waiver consideration <T3>unless </T3>you fail to cooperate in connection with the appeal, e.g.,if you fail (without good reason) to give us medical or other evidencewe request, or to go for a physical or mental examination when requested,in connection with the appeal.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-17352 Filed 8-1-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4190-11-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>